usr/share/hunspell/mr_IN.dic
अंगाई/Aacd
अंतःस्थिती/Aacdh
अंधपणा/Aacd
अकडी/FAacd
अक्कलकोट/Aac
अगस्ती/Aacd
अठ्ठी/Aacd
अणुचाचणी/Aacd
अतिरथिमहारथी/Aacdh
अधेली/Aacde
अनाडी/Aacd
अनुसूची/Aacd
अपूर्वाई/Aacd
अफू/Aacd
अभिवृद्धी/Aacd
अमरावती/Aacd
अमोनिया/Aacd
अर्धनारी/Aacdh
अलाहाबाद/Aacki
अल्बम/Aac
अवनती/Aacd
असंगती/Aacdh
अस्तित्ववादी/Acadhe
आंधळी/Aacd
आईमाई/Aacdh
आकृती/Aacdh
आजा/Aacdh
आठवणी/Aacdh
आत्ता/AacZ
आदरबुद्धी/Aacd
आधारसामग्री/Aacd
आपुलकी/Aacd
आमराई/Aacd
आर/&Aac
आरोळी/Aacd
आळू/Aacdh
आवाळू/Aacdh
आहारशैली/Aacd
इंजिनियर/AackS
इंडिकेटर/Aac
इकॉनॉमी/Aacd
इडली/Aacd
इनामदारी/Aacd
इन्स्टिट्यूट/Aac
इराण/Aac
इष्टापत्ती/Aacd
इस्लामवादी/Acadhe
उंच्या/Aacd
उघड्या/Aacd
उठबस/Aac
उत्तरप्रदेश/Aack
उद्योगपती/Aacdh
उपनदी/Aacd
उमेदवारी/Aacd
उल्हासनगर/Aac
ऊदबत्ती/Aacd
ऋद्धिसिद्धी/Aacdh
एअरबस/Aac
एकदोन/Aacf
एकाधिकारशाही/Aacd
एक्झाम/Aac
एक्स्प्रेस/Aac
एड्स/Aac
एम/&Aac
एव्हरेस्ट/Aac
ऑडिओ/Aac
ऑफिस/Aacf
ऑस्कर/Aac
ओटी/Aacd
ओवळ्या/Aacd
औटकी/Aacd
कंटाळवाण्या/Aacd
कंडी/Aacd
कंप्यूटर/AacS
कच्चीबच्ची/Aacd
कढई/Aacd
कनेक्शन/Aac
कपी/Aacdh
कमनशिबा/FAacd
कमिटी/Aacd
कम्युनिझम/Aac
करणी/Aacd
करवंटी/Aacd
करोना/Aacd
कर्तव्यपूर्ती/Aacd
कर्मभूमी/Aacd
कलाप्रेमी/Aacdh
कलेक्टर/Aacf
कळशी/Aacd
कवाली/Aacd
कस्टमर/Aac
काँट्रॅक्टर/Aac
कांदिवली/Aacd
काका/Aacdh
काजी/Aacdh
काडी/Aacd
काथ्या/Aacdh
कापणी/Aacd
कामिनी/Aacdh
कार्निवल/Aac
कार्यपद्धती/Aacdh
कालावधी/Aacdh
काशी/Aacd
काहीवस्तू/Aacdh
किनारपट्टी/Aacd
किशोरकुमार/Aac
कुंडलिनी/Aacd
कुटाळकी/Aacd
कुणाकुणा/Aacd
कुमारी/Aacdh
कुलवधू/Aacdh
कूकर/Aac
कॅटलॉग/Aac
कॅन्सर/Aac
कॅम्प/Aac
कॅल्शिअम/Aack
केकयी/Aacd
केमिस्ट/Aac
केसपेपर्स/Aac
कॉटेज/Aac
कॉमर्स/Aac
कॉर्न/Aac
कॉलरा/Aac
कोकण/Aacf
कोठी/Aacd
कोरिया/Aacd
कोल्हेकुई/Aacd
क्रिएटिव्हिटी/Aac
क्रेडिट/Aac
क्लासेस/Aac
क्वार्टर/AacS
खंडणी/Aacd
खतावणी/Aacd
खऱ्याखुऱ्या/Aacd
खवैय्या/Aacdh
खातरी/Aacd
खान/Aacf
खिळखिळ्या/Aacd
खुपऱ्या/Aacdh
खेतीवाडी/Aacd
खोली/Aacd
गंगोत्री/Aacd
गटारी/Aacd
गणपूर्ती/Aacd
गप्पागोष्टी/Aacdh
गर्दी/Aacd
गवळ्या/FAacdh
गांधीभवन/Aacf
गाडगेबाबा/Aacdh
गानसरस्वती/Aacdh
गाळणी/Aacd
गिरणी/Aacd
गुंडी/Aacd
गुठळी/Aacde
गुप्ती/Aacd
गुरुवार/Aacf
गूगल/Aac
गॅप/Aac
गैरमर्जी/Aacd
गोटीबंद/Aacf
गोरिला/Aacdh
ग्रंथदिंडी/Aacd
ग्राफ/Aac
ग्लास/Aacf
घडवंची/Aacd
घराणेशाही/Aacd
घामोळ्या/Aacd
घोडागाडी/Aacd
चकती/Aacd
चढाई/Aacd
चमत्कृती/Aacdh
चवथी/Aacd
चांदोबा/Aacdh
चारचौघी/Aacdh
चाळिशी/Aacd
चिकण्या/Aacd
चित्तवृत्ती/Aacd
चित्रमहर्षी/Aacdh
चिमटी/Aacdh
चुकी/Aacd
चॅम्पियनशिप/Aac
चेकमेट/Aac
चॉकलेट/Aac
चौकी/Aacd
चौपायी/Aacd
छडी/Aacd
छाती/Aacd
जंबिया/Aacdh
जनजागृती/Aacd
जन्मकहाणी/Aacd
जपान/Aac
जमीनदारी/Aacd
जलवाहिनी/Aacd
जांभई/Aacd
जातीजाती/FAacdh
जिच्या/Aacd
जिवती/Aacdh
जीवजंतू/Aacdh
जीवसृष्टी/Aacd
जे/&Aac
जोखमी/Aacd
जोशीबाई/Aacdh
ज्यांच्या/Aad
ज्वेलर/AacS
झाडावरी/Aacd
झिमझिमत्या/Aacd
टँक/Aac
टग्या/Aacdh
टवळी/Aacd
टाकी/Aacd
टाळेबंदी/Aacd
टिटवाळा/Aacs
टी/&Aac
टॅग/Aac
टेकडी/Aacd
टेप/Aac
टेलिव्हिजन/Aac
टॉमेटो/Aac
टोळी/Aacd
ट्रान्सफर/Aac
ट्रॅव्हल/AacS
ट्रेलर/Aac
डबलसीट/Aac
डाएट/Aac
डायपर/AacS
डिक्शनरी/Aacd
डिप्लोमा/Aacd
डिसुझा/Aac
डॅशिंग/Aac
डेव्हलपर/AacS
डॉन/Aac
ड्राइव्ह/Aac
ड्रेसेस/Abc
तंद्री/Aacd
तत्पूर्वी/Aac
तबकडी/Aacd
तरंगिणी/Aacdh
तलावपाळी/Aacd
तागडी/Aacd
तान्हुल्या/Aacdh
तालिबान/Aac
तिपायी/Aacd
तिवई/Aacd
तुमच्या/Aad
तुसड्या/Aacd
तेलमाफिया/Aacdh
तोवर/Aacf
त्याच्या/AadZ
त्र्याऐंशी/Aacdh
थायलंड/Aac
थैली/Aacd
दंडेली/Aacd
दडपशाही/Aacd
दरवाजा/Aacdhe
दवबिंदू/Aacdh
दांडी/Aacd
दाढीमिशी/Aacd
दादाभाई/Aacdh
दारूमुक्ती/Aacd
दिलीपकुमार/Aac
दिव्यचक्षू/Aacdh
दीपावली/Aacd
दुधी/Aacdh
दुर्गप्रेमी/Aacdh
दुसऱ्या/Aacdh
दूरध्वनी/Aacdh
देवदासी/Aacdh
देशपांडे/Aacdhe
दैत्यगुरू/Aacdh
दोन्ही/Aacdh
द्विरुक्ती/Aacd
धनश्री/Aacdh
धरित्री/Aacd
धाकटी/Aacd
धुक्या/FAacd
धुसफुशी/FAacd
ध्वनिनिर्मिती/Aacd
नऊवारी/Aacd
नगरी/Aacd
नदी/Aacd
नर्सिंग/Aac
नवरात्री/Aacd
नांगी/Aacd
नाकाबंदी/Aacd
नागोबा/Aacdh
नाट्यकृती/Aacdh
नानखटाई/Aacd
नायट्रोजन/Aack
नावनिशाणी/Aacd
निग्रो/Aacdh
निमोनिया/Aacd
निर्मिती/Aacd
निश्चिती/Aacd
नूडल्स/Aac
नेणत्या/Aacd
नेमणुकी/Aacdh
नॉर्मल/Aac
नोटपॅड/Aac
न्याहरी/Aacd
पंक्चर/Aac
पंड्या/Aacdh
पचडी/Aacd
पठ्ठ्या/Aacd
पणजोबा/Aacdh
पत्नी/Aacd
पदाती/Aacdh
पन्हळी/Aacd
परक्या/Aacd
परमगुरू/Aacdh
परवानगी/Aacd
परीराणी/Aacdh
पर्स/Aac
पवनचक्की/Aacd
पांगळ्या/Aacdh
पाककृती/Aacdh
पाचवी/Aacd
पाटील/Aac
पाणीगळती/Aacd
पादशहा/Aacdh
पायथागोरस/Aac
पारोशा/Aacd
पार्वती/Aacd
पावडर/Aacg
पावणेपाच/Aac
पास/Aac
पिंपळी/Aacd
पिपाणी/Aacd
पुंगळी/Aacd
पुण्यतिथी/Aacd
पुनरावृत्ती/Aacd
पुरवणी/Aacd
पुष्पांजली/Aacd
पूर्ववाहिनी/Aacd
पॅच/Aac
पॅरासाईट/Aac
पेटंट/Aac
पेशी/Aacdh
पॉलीहाऊस/Aac
पोपई/Aacd
पोस्टमॉर्टम/Aac
प्रतिध्वनी/Aacdh
प्रभादेवी/Aacdh
प्रादेशिकवादी/Acadhe
प्रॉडक्ट/Aac
प्लॅटफॉर्म/Aac
फरसबंदी/Aacd
फाटक्या/Aacd
फिनिश/Aac
फुटक्या/Aacd
फूलबाजी/Aacd
फेसबुक/Aac
फोर्स/Aac
बँकरेट/Aac
बक्षिशी/Aacd
बदनामी/Aacd
बळी/Aacdh
बांधणी/Aacd
बाटवाबाटवी/Aacd
बायबल/Aack
बालमृत्यू/Aacdh
बाहत्तर/Aacf
बियर/Aac
बुकी/Aacd
बृहन्मुंबई/Aacd
बेंचेस/Aac
बेपर्वाई/Aacd
बॉल/Aac
बोलबच्चन/Aac
ब्रह्मपुत्रा/Aacdj
ब्रोमाइड/Aac
भगिनी/Aacdh
भरारी/Aacd
भाकरी/Aacd
भातलावणी/Aacd
भाषाप्रभू/Aacdh
भिशी/Aacd
भूमी/Aacd
भ्रांती/Aacd
मगरुरी/Aacd
मतदारयादी/Aac
मनस्विनी/Aacdh
मराठीमंडळी/Aacdh
मसाजसाठी/Aacd
महारोगी/Aacd
माईनिंग/Aac
मातृ/Aacdh
मानिनी/Aacdh
मायानगरी/Aacd
मालती/Aacdh
मिठी/Aacd
मिशनरी/Aacdh
मुजाहिदीन/Aac
मुसाफिरी/Aacd
मॅनेजर/AacfS
मेदवृद्धी/Aacd
मैफिली/Aacdh
मोटरसायकल/Aacg
मोळी/Aacd
यंत्रसामग्री/Aacd
याज्ञिकी/Aacdh
युद्धभूमी/Aacd
येण्याजाण्या/Aacd
रंगावली/Aacd
रणदुंदुभी/Aacdh
रमाताई/Aacdh
राक्षसी/Aacdh
राजा/Aacdh
रापी/Aacd
राष्ट्रउभारणी/Aacd
रिकामटेकड्या/Aacdh
रिवॉर्ड/Aac
रूपवती/Aacdh
रेवडी/Aacd
रोगमुक्ती/Aacd
लँडलाईन/Aac
लग्नसराई/Aacd
लांडीलबाडी/Aacd
लाठी/Aacd
लावालावी/Aacd
लिफ्टमन/Aac
लेक्चर/Aac
लॉ/Aac
लोकरूढी/Aacdh
लोळी/Aacd
वतनदारी/Aacd
वरलक्ष्मी/Aacdh
वल्ली/Aacdh
वही/Aacd
वाचाविशी/Aacd
वामकुक्षी/Aacd
वाळू/Aacdh
विकेट/Aac
विठाई/Aacdh
विद्यासाठी/Aacd
विभक्ती/Aacdh
विषयसूची/Aacd
वृक्षराजी/Aacd
वेदमूर्ती/Aacdh
वैयाकरणी/Aacdh
व्यभिचारिणी/Aacdh
व्ही/&Aac
शकुनी/Aacdh
शरीरप्रकृती/Aacdh
शांततावादी/Acadhe
शाहत्तर/Aacf
शिधासामग्री/Aacd
शिवपिंडी/Aacdh
शिष्टाई/Aacd
शॅम्पू/Aac
शेतकी/Aacd
शॉप/Aac
श्रावणी/Aacd
श्रेयनामावली/Aacd
संगमेश्वर/Aac
संध्याकाळ/Aacg
संस्कृती/Aacdh
सट्टेबाजी/Aacd
सत्यपरिस्थिती/Aacd
सनलाईट/Aac
सभापती/Aacdh
सम्राज्ञी/Aacdh
सराई/Aacd
सळई/Aacd
सहानुभूती/Aacd
साईट/AacS
साडेबारा/Aacd
साम्राज्यवादी/Acadhe
सावकारकी/Aacd
साहित्यप्रेमी/Aacdh
सिद्धसरस्वती/Aacdh
सीट/Aac
सुट्या/Aacdh
सुफी/Aacdh
सुसंगती/Aacdh
सेंट्रल/Aac
सेलिंग/Aac
सोंगाड्या/Aacd
सोलापूर/Aac
स्कूलबस/Aac
स्टार/AacS
स्ट्रगल/Aac
स्नायू/Aacdh
स्पॉन्सर/Aac
स्वभावशैली/Aacdh
स्वेटर/Aac
हत्ती/Aacdh
हर्षवायू/Aacd
हाडमोडी/Aacd
हावऱ्या/Aacdh
हिराबाई/Aacdhu
हुलकावणी/Aacd
हेमामालिनी/Aacd
हॉलिवूड/Aac
ॲक्टर/Aac
